en: Migros M-Check Animal Welfare 5/5, M-Check Animal Welfare 5/5
xx: Migros M-Check Animal Welfare 5/5, M-Check Animal Welfare 5/5
de: Migros M-Check Tierwohl 5/5, M-Check Tierwohl 5/5
fr: Migros M-Check Bien-être Animal 5/5, M-Check Bien-être Animal 5/5
it: Migros M-Check Benessere degli animali 5/5, M-Check Benessere degli animali 5/5

en: Migros M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 1/5, M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 1/5
xx: Migros M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 1/5, M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 1/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 1/5, M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 1/5
fr: Migros M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 1/5, M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 1/5
it: Migros M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 1/5, M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 1/5

en: Migros M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 2/5, M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 2/5
xx: Migros M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 2/5, M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 2/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 2/5, M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 2/5
fr: Migros M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 2/5, M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 2/5
it: Migros M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 2/5, M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 2/5

en: Migros M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 3/5, M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 3/5
xx: Migros M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 3/5, M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 3/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 3/5, M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 3/5
fr: Migros M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 3/5, M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 3/5
it: Migros M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 3/5, M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 3/5

en: Migros M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 4/5, M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 4/5
xx: Migros M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 4/5, M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 4/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 4/5, M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 4/5
fr: Migros M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 4/5, M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 4/5
it: Migros M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 4/5, M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 4/5

en: Migros M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 5/5, M-Check Environmentally friendly packaging 5/5
xx: Migros M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 5/5, M-Check environmentally friendly packaging 5/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 5/5, M-Check Umweltfreundliche Verpackung 5/5
fr: Migros M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 5/5, M-Check Emballage respectueux de l'environnement 5/5
it: Migros M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 5/5, M-Check Imballaggio ecologico 5/5

en: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 1/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 1/5
xx: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 1/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 1/5
de: Migros M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 1/5, M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 1/5
fr: Migros M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 1/5, M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 1/5
it: Migros M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 1/5, M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 1/5

en: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 2/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 2/5
xx: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 2/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 2/5
de: Migros M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 2/5, M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 2/5
fr: Migros M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 2/5, M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 2/5
it: Migros M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 2/5, M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 2/5

en: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 3/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 3/5
xx: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 3/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 3/5
de: Migros M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 3/5, M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 3/5
fr: Migros M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 3/5, M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 3/5
it: Migros M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 3/5, M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 3/5

en: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 4/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 4/5
xx: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 4/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 4/5
de: Migros M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 4/5, M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 4/5
fr: Migros M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 4/5, M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 4/5
it: Migros M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 4/5, M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 4/5

en: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 5/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 5/5
xx: Migros M-Check fish from responsible sources 5/5, M-Check fish from responsible sources 5/5
de: Migros M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 5/5, M-Check Fisch aus verantwortungsvollen Quellen 5/5
fr: Migros M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 5/5, M-Check Poisson de sources responsables 5/5
it: Migros M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 5/5, M-Check Pesce proveniente da fonti responsabili 5/5

en: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 1/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 1/5
xx: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 1/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 1/5
de: Migros M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 1/5, M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 1/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants recyclables 1/5, M-Check Composants recyclables 1/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti riciclabili 1/5, M-Check Componenti riciclabili 1/5

en: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 2/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 2/5
xx: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 2/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 2/5
de: Migros M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 2/5, M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 2/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants recyclables 2/5, M-Check Composants recyclables 2/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti riciclabili 2/5, M-Check Componenti riciclabili 2/5

en: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 3/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 3/5
xx: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 3/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 3/5
de: Migros M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 3/5, M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 3/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants recyclables 3/5, M-Check Composants recyclables 3/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti riciclabili 3/5, M-Check Componenti riciclabili 3/5

en: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 4/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 4/5
xx: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 4/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 4/5
de: Migros M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 4/5, M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 4/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants recyclables 4/5, M-Check Composants recyclables 4/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti riciclabili 4/5, M-Check Componenti riciclabili 4/5

en: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 5/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 5/5
xx: Migros M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 5/5, M-Check Recyclable Constituent Materials 5/5
de: Migros M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 5/5, M-Check Rezyklierbare Inhaltsstoffe 5/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants recyclables 5/5, M-Check Composants recyclables 5/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti riciclabili 5/5, M-Check Componenti riciclabili 5/5

en: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 1/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 1/5
xx: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 1/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 1/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 1/5, M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 1/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 1/5, M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 1/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 1/5, M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 1/5

en: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 2/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 2/5
xx: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 2/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 2/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 2/5, M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 2/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 2/5, M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 2/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 2/5, M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 2/5

en: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 3/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 3/5
xx: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 3/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 3/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 3/5, M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 3/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 3/5, M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 3/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 3/5, M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 3/5

en: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 4/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 4/5
xx: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 4/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 4/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 4/5, M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 4/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 4/5, M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 4/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 4/5, M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 4/5